Hawaii statutes.
[§531B-5] Written instrument to
control disposition of remains. A person who wishes to authorize another
person to control the disposition of remains and the arrangements for funeral
goods and services may execute a written instrument before a notary public.
The written instrument shall be in substantially the following form:

"State of____________________

County of____________________

I, _______________ do hereby designate
________________ as the sole person who will have the right to determine and
decide the disposition of my remains upon my death and the arrangements for
funeral goods and services. I __ have/ __ have not attached specific
directions concerning the disposition of my remains. If I have attached
specific directions, the designee shall substantially comply with the specific
directions, provided the directions are lawful and there are sufficient
resources in my estate to carry out the directions.

SIGNATURE: Sign and date the form here:

_____________________________ _

(sign your name) (date)

_____________________________

(print your name)

DECLARATION OF NOTARY:

Subscribed and sworn before me, __________________
(insert name of notary public), on this _____________ day of _______________,
in the year _______.

Notary Seal

____________________________

(Signature of
Notary Public)"

[L 2013, c 17, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next